Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.580

State agency communication plan for emergencies and disasters—Copy to legislature—Report.

Beginning December 1, 2019, a state agency that provides life safety information in an emergency or disaster must provide, to the relevant committees of the legislature, a copy of its current communication plan for notifying significant population segments of such information, including the agency's point of contact. The state agency must also submit an annual report to the relevant committees of the legislature identifying those instances of emergency or disaster in the preceding year in which life safety information was provided and what public messaging strategies and means were used to notify citizens with limited English proficiency.

[ 2017 c 312 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2017 c 312: "The legislature finds that, as a matter of human dignity, all persons should be informed of emergency notifications in a manner in which they can understand. It is the intent of the legislature that all persons who may be in harm's way in an emergency are informed of their peril, and informed of appropriate actions they should take to protect themselves and their families." [ 2017 c 312 s 1.]